Connecticut, session 2026, HB05329.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) For the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2027, and each fiscal year thereafter, the Department of
Education shall establish a competitive grant program to be known as
the "Connecticut Education Innovation Grant Program" to fund
educational innovations in schools. When awarding grants under said
grant program, the department shall prioritize education innovation
project proposals that are designed to improve one or more of the
following: (1) Early literacy and numeracy outcomes for students from
birth to grade eight, inclusive, (2) access to and the impact of high-
dosage tutoring in reading and mathematics, (3) college, career and
service navigation for students and families, (4) career and early college
pathways for students in middle school and high school, (5) effective
family and community engagement, including, but not limited to,
language access, (6) staffing and talent management models, including,
but not limited to, differentiated compensation, master educator and
team-teaching models, (7) district and administrative structures, and (8)
play-based learning, as defined in section 10-24f of the general statutes.
(b) Any local or regional board of education, regional educational
service center, governing council of a charter school or other public or
LCO 1 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5329
nonprofit education provider approved by the Commissioner of
Education may apply, in the form and manner specified by the
commissioner, for a grant under the Connecticut Education Innovation
Grant Program to plan, implement or scale an education innovation
project. Each grant application shall include, but need not be limited to,
(1) a description of the education challenge to be addressed and the
student population to be served, (2) a plan of action and description of
the proposed activities, (3) the baseline data and proposed outcome
measures, including, but not limited to, targets for student achievement
and other relevant indicators, (4) implementation steps and timelines,
and (5) a plan for evaluating the effectiveness of and sharing lessons
from the project.
(c) The Department of Education shall award grants under the
Connecticut Education Innovation Grant Program for the following
durations: (1) A period of not more than one year for planning grants,
and (2) a period of not more than three years for implementation and
scale grants.
(d) (1) Any applicant for a grant under the Connecticut Education
Innovation Grant Program may request a waiver from the
Commissioner of Education of one or more statutory or regulatory
requirements that such recipient demonstrates are a significant barrier
to the design or implementation of the education innovation project.
(2) The commissioner may grant such waiver request for a specified
period of time, not to exceed the duration of the grant, if the
commissioner finds the (A) waiver is necessary to carry out the project,
(B) project is designed to improve student outcomes, and (C) applicant
established clear and measurable goals for the project. The
commissioner shall not waive the provisions of part I of chapter 166 of
the general statutes, chapters 169 and 172 of the general statutes and
sections 10-14n to 10-14w, inclusive, 10-15, 10-16, 10-16b, 10-76d, 10-186,
10-221a, 10-223e, 10-226a to 10-226h, inclusive, and 10-233c of the
general statutes, any requirement related to a state-approved literacy or
numeracy instructional model or any requirement of federal law.
LCO 2 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5329
(3) The commissioner may terminate a waiver prior to the expiration
of the waiver period or grant period if the commissioner determines that
(A) an applicant has failed to make satisfactory progress toward the
goals of the project, or (B) continuation of the project is inconsistent with
state education goals.
(e) (1) Each recipient of a grant under the Connecticut Education
Innovation Grant Program shall submit, at such time and in such
manner as specified by the Department of Education, a report to the
department on the implementation and results of the education
innovation project, including, but not limited to, data on student
outcomes disaggregated by grade, school and student subgroup in a
manner that complies with the requirements of the Family Educational
Rights and Privacy Act, 20 USC 1232g, as amended from time to time.
Such report shall be submitted not less than annually, until at least one
year after the termination of the grant period.
(2) Not later than January 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the
Department of Education shall submit, in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to education a report summarizing the grants awarded,
outcomes achieved and promising practices identified under the
Connecticut Education Innovation Grant Program during the prior
fiscal year.
(f) There is established an account to be known as the "Connecticut
education innovation fund", which shall be a separate, nonlapsing
account. The account shall contain any moneys required by law to be
deposited in the account. Moneys in the account shall be expended by
the Department of Education for the purposes of the Connecticut
Education Innovation Grant Program.
Sec. 2. Section 10-262j of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is amended by adding subsection (l) as follows (Effective July 1, 2026):
(NEW) (l) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, and each fiscal year
LCO 3 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5329
thereafter, any district that has received a grant under the Connecticut
Education Innovation Grant Program, established pursuant to section 1
of this act, during such fiscal year shall not be required to include the
amount of such grant in the calculation of such district's budgeted
appropriation for education for the subsequent fiscal year.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 10-262j(l)
ED Joint Favorable Subst. C/R APP
LCO 4 of 4